Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 7. General Provisions.

Sec. 43.23.295.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“Alaska permanent fund” means the fund established by art. IX, § 15 of the state constitution;

“disabled” means physically or mentally unable to complete and sign an application due to a serious emotional disturbance, visual, orthopedic, or other health impairment, or developmental disability that is attributable to intellectual disability, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, autism, or other cause; “disabled” does not mean “incompetent”;

“dividend fund” means the fund established by AS

43.23.045

;

“individual” means a natural person;

“permanent fund dividend” means a right to receive a payment from the dividend fund;

“qualifying year” means the year immediately preceding January 1 of the current dividend year;

“state resident” means an individual who is physically present in the state with the intent to remain indefinitely in the state under the requirements of AS

01.10.055

or, if the individual is not physically present in the state, intends to return to the state and remain indefinitely in the state under the requirements of AS

01.10.055

;

“year” means a calendar year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 55 SLA 1983; am § 6 ch 68 SLA 1990; am § 38 ch 168 SLA 1990; am § 16 ch 4 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 73 SLA 1996; am §§ 7, 8 ch 44 SLA 1998; am § 13 ch 42 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

43.23.095

; renumbered in 2018.

Administrative Code. —

For permanent fund dividend program, see 15 AAC 23, art. 1.